Montana, session 2025, HB465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 71-3-562, MCA, is amended to read:
"71-3-562. Limitation on actions -- notice. (1) All actions under this part must be commenced within
2 years from the date of the filing of the lien.
(2) No later than 90 days after the expiration of the period of limitation set forth in subsection (1), a
person who filed the action against a contracting owner shall file a notice of action to foreclose the lien with the
clerk and recorder. The notice must identify the parties to the action, the court where the action is located, THE
LEGAL DESCRIPTION OF THE REAL PROPERTY, and the date of the filing of the complaint. A copy of the complaint
must be attached to the notice.
(3) If a person fails to file a notice of action to foreclose within 90 days after the expiration of the
time period of limitation set forth in subsection (1), the lien is discharged."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 465